Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "State Parks
Emergency Maintenance Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2254.3A of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Beginning December 31, 2025, and no later than December 31 each
year thereafter, the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department
Req. No. 10755 Page 1

shal l submit in written or electronic format to the Governor, the
Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, the President Pro
Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate, the Appropriations and Budget
Chair of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the
Appropriations Chair of the Oklahoma State Senate an annual report
on the maintenance, infrastructure, and construction needs of the
State Parks System overseen by the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Department. The annual report shall be known and may be cited as
the "Eight-Year State Parks Emergency Maintenance Plan", and shall
include:
1. Maintenance, infrastructure, and construction projects
listed in order of priority and critical need;
2. Cost estimates for each specific project listed in
paragraph 1 of this subsection;
3. Completion timeline for each specific project listed in
paragraph 1 of this subsection; and
4. A summary of the status of projects previously funded and
currently being funded pursuant to the provisions of the State Parks
Emergency Maintenance Act.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2254.3B of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department to be designated
Req. No. 10755 Page 2

the "State Parks Emergency Maintenance Revolving Fund". The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Tourism and
Recreation Department eligible under law and directed for deposit to
such fund. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma
Tourism and Recreation Department in amounts as authorized by the
Oklahoma Legislature, for the purpose of implementing the
Department's Eight-Year State Parks Emergency Maintenance Plan, as
described in Section 2 of this act; provided, that in no event shall
an amount greater than twenty percent (20%) of the annual amount
accruing to the fund shall be used for funding operational expenses
of the Department in any given state fiscal year. Expenditures from
said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10755 MJ 12/12/24
Req. No. 10755 Page 3